Maryland, session 2026, SB0930.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Personnel and Pensions
24–401.1.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “DROP” means the Deferred Retirement Option Program established
under this section.
(3) “DROP member” means a member of the State Police Retirement
System who:
(i) is eligible to participate in the DROP as provided in subsection
(c) of this section; and
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0930*

SENATE BILL 930
(ii) elects to participate in the DROP as provided in subsection (e) of
this section.
(f) (1) A DROP member’s participation in the DROP shall commence on the
first day of the month following acceptance by the Board of Trustees of the DROP member’s
completed election form, retirement application form, and any other information required
by the Board of Trustees.
(2) A DROP member is a retiree of the State Police Retirement System.
(g) Participation in the DROP ends if the DROP participant:
(1) separates from employment in accordance with the binding letter of
resignation submitted with the member’s election form;
(2) except for the Secretary of State Police, attains age 60;
(3) dies;
(4) is terminated from employment by the Maryland State Police at any
time before the date specified on the member’s election form;
(5) shortens the time period for participation in the DROP by delivering to
the Maryland State Police and the Board of Trustees written notice of the intent of the
DROP member to terminate employment; or
(6) accepts a special disability retirement allowance as provided in
subsection (k) of this section.
(k) (1) A DROP member is eligible to apply for a special disability retirement
allowance under § 29–111 of this article if after the DROP member commences
participation in the DROP:
(i) the member is totally and permanently incapacitated for duty
arising out of or in the course of the actual performance of duty that occurs while
participating in DROP, and without willful negligence of the member; and
(ii) the medical board certifies that:
1. the member is totally incapacitated, either mentally or
physically, for the further performance of duty by the occurrence described under item (i)
of this paragraph;
2. the incapacity is likely to be permanent; and
3. the member should be retired.

SENATE BILL 930 3
(2) (i) If a DROP member is granted a special disability retirement
allowance, the DROP member shall:
1. submit an application to the Board of Trustees, on the
form the Board of Trustees provides, to receive payment of the amount accrued in the DROP
in accordance with subsection (i) of this section;
2. execute a written waiver of any benefits to which the
DROP member may be entitled under the DROP; and
3. submit an application to retire with a special disability
retirement allowance, on the form the Board of Trustees provides, stating the effective date
of the DROP member’s retirement as a special disability retiree.
(ii) On acceptance of the application for payment and application to
retire, the Board of Trustees shall commence payment of a special disability allowance to
the DROP member as provided in § 29–111(c) of this article, except that the DROP
member’s average final compensation shall be computed as of the effective date of the
DROP member’s application for a special disability retirement allowance.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Board” means the Board of Trustees for the State Retirement and
Pension System.
(3) “DROP” has the meaning stated under § 24–401.1 of the State
Personnel and Pensions Article.
(b) This section applies to an individual who:
(1) was a member of the State Police Retirement System;
(2) enrolled in DROP on or after July 1, 2020;
(3) prior to enrolling in DROP, was involved in a work–related accident;
and
(4) before July 1, 2026, ceased participation in DROP.
(c) (1) (i) An individual described under subsection (b) of this section may
submit an application for a special disability retirement allowance under § 29–111 of the
State Personnel and Pensions Article.
(ii) Notwithstanding § 24–401.1(k)(1)(i) of the State Personnel and
Pensions Article, the Board may award a special disability retirement allowance under §

SENATE BILL 930
29–111 of the State Personnel and Pensions Article for an individual described under
subsection (b) of this section.
(2) An individual described under subsection (b) of this section shall submit
an application for a special disability retirement allowance under § 29–111 of the State
Personnel and Pensions Article:
(i) on or before December 31, 2026; and
(ii) by submitting to the Board a form provided by the State
Retirement Agency for the purpose of applying for a special disability retirement allowance
under this Act.
(d) If the Board grants a special disability retirement allowance in accordance
with this section, the retiree shall be entitled to benefits:
(1) from the date of the award of a special disability retirement allowance,
in accordance with § 29–111 of the State Personnel and Pensions Article; and
(2) from the date on which benefits would have been paid in accordance
with the State Personnel and Pensions Article through the date of an award of a special
disability retirement allowance in accordance with this section, the difference between the
benefits that would have been paid under a special disability retirement allowance and the
benefits the retiree received prior to the award of a special disability retirement allowance.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026. It shall remain effective for a period of 6 months and, at the end of December 31,
2026, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated
and of no further force and effect.